Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6157.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 20-2 of the General Laws entitled "Licensing" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
20-2-46. Green crab harvest and license.
(a) Any person may take the aquatic invasive species commonly known as green crabs,
more specifically known as the species carcinis maenas.
(b) Rhode Island residents may be granted a commercial green crab license for a fee of ten
dollars ($10.00) per season.
(c) The director is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations for the commercial green
crab license.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002170/SUB A
========